Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5690YH (6) 91 je/js H.F. 2384 Section 1. Section 96.3, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Duration of benefits. The maximum total amount of 3 benefits payable to an eligible individual during a benefit 4 year shall not exceed the total of the wage credits accrued to 5 the individualâs account during the individualâs base period, 6 or sixteen twenty-six times the individualâs weekly benefit 7 amount, whichever is the lesser. The director shall maintain 8 a separate account for each individual who earns wages in 9 insured work. The director shall compute wage credits for 10 each individual by crediting the individualâs account with 11 one-third of the wages for insured work paid to the individual 12 during the individualâs base period. However, the director 13 shall recompute wage credits for an individual who is laid 14 off due to the individualâs employer going out of business at 15 the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the 16 individual was last employed, by crediting the individualâs 17 account with one-half, instead of one-third, of the wages for 18 insured work paid to the individual during the individualâs 19 base period. Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall 20 be charged against the base period wage credits in the 21 individualâs account which have not been previously charged, 22 in the inverse chronological order as the wages on which the 23 wage credits are based were paid. However if the state âoffâ 24 indicator is in effect and if the individual is laid off due to 25 the individualâs employer going out of business at the factory, 26 establishment, or other premises at which the individual was 27 last employed, the maximum benefits payable shall be extended 28 to twenty-six thirty-nine times the individualâs weekly benefit 29 amount, but not to exceed the total of the wage credits accrued 30 to the individualâs account. 31